Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2001
Formation; name; title.

Any agricultural association formed for the purpose of developing and improving some form of agriculture in this state which files with the Secretary of State a copy of its constitution and bylaws, shall be declared a corporation under the name and title designated in such constitution.

Laws 1949, c. 2, § 1, p. 57.